California statutes. Insurance Code
 action that, if consummated, would constitute a violation, all voting securities of the converted insurer or of the person acquired by any person in excess of the maximum amount permitted to be acquired by the person pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed to be nonvoting securities of the converted insurer or of that person. The violation or action may be enforced or enjoined by an appropriate proceeding commenced by the converted insurer, a person, the commissioner, any policyholder or stockholder of the converted insurer, or the person on behalf of the converted insurer or the person in the superior court in the judicial district in which the converted insurer has its home office or in any other court having jurisdiction. The court may issue any order it finds necessary to cure the violation or to prevent the proposed action. In addition to the foregoing, whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has committed a violation of this section, the commissioner may proceed as provided in
 Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 to take possession of the property of the converted insurer and to conduct the business thereof.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “beneficial ownership,” with respect to voting securities, means the sole or shared power to vote, or direct the voting of, voting securities or the sole or shared power to dispose, or direct the disposition, of voting securities.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “voting security” includes voting stock as defined in Section 11535.1, any preorganization certificate or subscription, including subscription rights issued pursuant to a plan of conversion, or any security convertible, with or without consideration, into voting security, or carrying any warrant or right to subscribe for, or purchase any, voting security, or any such warrant or right.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “offer” includes an offer to buy or acquire, solicitation of an offer to sell, tender offer for, or request or invitation for tenders of a security or interest in a security for value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 417, Sec. 30.   (AB 1696)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11543.

Unless otherwise provided in the plan of conversion, the directors and officers of the mutual company shall serve as directors and officers of the converted company until new directors and officers have been duly elected and qualified pursuant to the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the stock company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 406, Sec. 17.   Effective August 19, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11543.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), actions concerning any plan of conversion, proposed plan of conversion, plan amendment, or proposed plan amendment under this chapter or any acts taken or proposed to be taken under this chapter shall be commenced within one year after the plan of conversion or plan amendment is filed in the office of the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 11536 or subdivision (a) of Section 11542, or six months from the effective date of the plan of conversion, whichever is later. If the plan of conversion is withdrawn, the actions or acts shall be commenced within six months from the date the board of directors approves a resolution to withdraw the plan. If an action concerns or arises out of a plan amendment or proposed plan amendment made under Section 11546, the applicable time period is measured from the filing, effective date, or approval of withdrawal of the plan amendment, whichever is later.

(b) Judicial review of any act of the commissioner or any other governmental body or officer concerning or arising out of any plan of conversion, proposed plan of conversion, plan amendment, or proposed plan amendment under this chapter may only be had by filing a petition for a writ of mandate within 30 days of the date of the act. However, any petition seeking judicial review shall be filed no later than 30 days from the effective date of the plan of conversion or plan amendment, whichever is the subject of the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 406, Sec. 18.   Effective August 19, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11544.

The offer or sale of securities issued pursuant to the plan of conversion developed and approved in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, shall be exempt from Article 8 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 988, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11545.

The commissioner shall have the authority from time to time, to make, amend and rescind such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The commissioner shall also have the authority to charge and collect from the insurer for the actual amount of expenses reasonably incurred by the state in discharge of the commissioner’s duties hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 988, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11546.

Upon completion of the act of conversion and issuance of the certificate of authority under Section 11542, the Secretary of State shall accept for filing a verified copy of the amended articles of incorporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 988, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11547.

(a) The amended articles of incorporation of a converted company that have been adopted pursuant to a plan of conversion and filed with the Secretary of State in accordance with Section 11542 may be further amended after the effective date pursuant to applicable law. The plan of conversion may be amended in other respects after the effective date of the plan as specified in this section. Such an amendment shall take effect upon filing with the Secretary of State after compliance with the following:

(1) Approval by a resolution of the majority of the board of directors of the converted company. The resolution shall specify the reasons for and the purposes of the proposed amendment.

(2) Submission to the commissioner for consent in writing, subject to the provisions of Section 11538.

(3) For the conversion of a mutual insurer, approval by a majority of those current policyholders of the corporation who were members of the former mutual insurer and were entitled to vote on the original plan of conversion approved pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11536 and who vote at a meeting called for that purpose.

(4) For the conversion of a mutual holding company, approval by a majority of those current members of the corporation who were members of the former mutual holding company and were entitled to vote on the original plan of conversion approved pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11536 and who vote at a meeting called for that purpose.

(5) Filed in the office of the commissioner after having been consented to and approved as contemplated by paragraphs (2), (3) and (4).

(b) If an amendment proposed under subdivision (a) would adversely affect the rights of one or more classes of members , but not all such members, then only the members of each class whose rights would be adversely affected by the proposed amendment are entitled to vote on the proposed plan amendment.

(c) A policyholder or member meeting prescribed by paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (a) shall be called by the board of directors, the chairperson of the board, or the president of the converted company. Notice of the meeting shall be given to policyholders or members entitled to vote at the meeting by mail at least 30 days prior to the date set for the meeting. Voting shall be by ballot, in person or by proxy. A quorum consists of 5 percent of the policyholders or members of the converted company entitled to vote at the meeting.

(d) At any time before the plan amendment becomes effective, the converted company may, by resolution of a majority of the board of directors, amend the plan amendment or withdraw its plan amendment. For an amendment to a plan amendment, all references in this section to the plan amendment shall be deemed to refer to the plan amendment as amended. Any amendment of the plan amendment shall require the written consent of the commissioner. No amendment shall be deemed to change the date of adoption of the plan amendment. No amendment made after approval by the policyholders or members as provided in paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (a) may change the plan amendment in a manner that the commissioner determines is materially disadvantageous to any of the affected policyholders or members unless the plan amendment as amended is submitted for reconsideration under the procedures prescribed for the original plan amendment policyholder or member approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 406, Sec. 19.   Effective August 19, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11548.

If the name of a mutual life insurer converting to a stock insurer pursuant to this chapter includes the word mutual, the new stock insurer may continue to use the word mutual in its name if the name includes a word or words that identify the new stock insurer as a stock insurer and the commissioner finds that the continued use of the word mutual in its name is not likely to mislead or deceive the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 406, Sec. 20.   Effective August 19, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11549.

(a) Pursuant to this section, a mutual holding company may merge into a foreign mutual holding company that is domiciled in a state to which the converted insurer has transferred its domicile or will transfer its domicile concurrently with the merger. The merger shall be effected pursuant to an agreement of merger between the mutual holding company and the foreign mutual holding company in accordance with the General Corporation Law, to the extent not inconsistent with this section. The merger shall take effect upon filing the agreement of merger with the California Secretary of State after compliance with the following:

(1) Approval of the agreement of merger by a resolution of the majority of the board of directors of the mutual holding company and signing of the agreement of merger by the parties thereto.

(2) Approval of an amendment to the converted insurer’s plan of conversion in accordance with Section 11547 by a resolution of the majority of the board of directors of the converted insurer in order to reflect appropriately the merger and transfer of domicile.

(3) Submission of the agreement of merger and the amendment to the commissioner for consent in writing.

(4) Approval of the agreement of merger by a majority of the members of the mutual holding company who vote at a meeting called for that purpose.

(5) Approval of the amendment by a majority of the members of the mutual holding company who were members of the converted insurer and were entitled to vote on the original plan of conversion approved pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11536 and who vote at a meeting called for the purpose.

(6) Filing of the agreement of merger in the office of the commissioner after having been consented to and approved as contemplated by paragraphs (2), (3), (4), and (5).

(b) The submission to the commissioner prescribed in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be accompanied by a filing fee of eight thousand one hundred dollars ($8,100), evidence that the foreign mutual holding company that will survive the merger is qualified as a foreign corporation under the General Corporation Law, and any other relevant information that the commissioner may require.

(c) The meetings of members prescribed in paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (a) and shall be called by the board of directors, the chairperson of the board, or the president of the mutual holding company, and may be combined at a single meeting with separate voting by those eligible to vote on the matters referred to in paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (a). Notice of the meeting shall be given by mail to members entitled to vote at the meeting at least 30 days prior to the date set for the meeting. Voting shall be by ballot, in person, or by proxy. A quorum for each such matter consists of 5 percent of the members of the mutual holding company entitled to vote at the meeting on the matter.

(d) The commissioner shall consent to any proposed merger and amendment if he or she determines that the merger will be fair and equitable to the mutual holding company and its members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 740, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. LIABILITY, WORKERS' COMPENSATION, AND COMMON CARRIER LIABILITY INSURANCE [11550. - 11895.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Regulations [11550. - 11629.88.]



  ARTICLE 1. Reserves of Insurers [11550. - 11557.]

11550.

As used in this article, the term “liability” means liability and common carrier liability insurance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11551.

As used in this article, the term “compensation” means workers’ compensation insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

11552.

As used in this article, the term “earned premium,” means the amount remaining of the gross premiums charged on all policies written, including all determined excess and additional premiums, after deducting the aggregate of:

(a) Return premiums other than premiums returned to policyholders as dividends.

(b) Reinsurance premiums and premiums on policies canceled.

(c) Unearned premiums on policies in force.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11553.

As used in this article, the terms “loss payments,” and “loss expense payments,” mean all payments to claimants or on account of claims. Such payments include but are not restricted to those for:

(a) Medical and surgical attendance.

(b) Legal expense.

(c) Salaries and expenses of investigators, adjusters and field men.

(d) Rents.

(e) Stationery, telegraph and telephone charges.

(f) Postage.

(g) Salaries and expenses of office employees.

(h) Home office expenses, and all other payments made on account of claims, whether or not such payments are allocated to specific losses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11554.

In estimating the condition of any insurer admitted to transact such liability or compensation insurance, the commissioner shall charge as liabilities, among any other items, the following:

(a) All outstanding indebtedness of such insurer.

(b) A premium reserve on policies in force, equal to the unearned portions of the gross premiums charged for covering the risks and computed on each respective risk from the date of the issuance of the policy.

(c) Proper reserves for outstanding losses, computed as set forth in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11555.

An insurer transacting such compensation or liability insurance shall include the following schedules in its annual statement required by law:

(a) A schedule showing distribution of unallocated liability loss expense payments.

(b) A schedule showing distribution of unallocated compensation loss expense payments.

(c) A schedule of its experience under policies of such insurance, in such form as the commissioner prescribes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11555.2.

Each insurer transacting insurance covering liability for malpractice of any person licensed under the Dental Practice Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code), under the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code), or under the State Bar Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), shall report all of the following statistics to the commissioner, by profession and by medical specialty, upon request of the commissioner:

(a) The total number of doctors or lawyers written during the immediately preceding calendar year.

(b) The total amount of premiums received from insureds, both written and earned (as reported in the annual statement), during the immediately preceding calendar year.

(c) The number of claims reported to the insurer for the first time separately by the year the claim occurred, and the number of claims reported closed during a previous calendar year which were reopened separately by the year the claim occurred.

(d) The total number of claims outstanding, together with the monetary amount reserved for loss and allocated loss expense, in the annual statement as of December 31 of the calendar year next preceding, separately stated by the year the claim occurred.

(e) (1) The number of claims closed with payment to the claimant during the calendar year next preceding, to be reported by the year the claim occurred, (2) the total monetary amount paid thereon, reported by the year the claim occurred, and (3) the total allocated loss expense paid thereon, reported by the year the claim occurred.

(f) The monetary amount paid on claims during the calendar year next preceding, to be reported separately by the year the claim occurred, with allocated loss expense paid, to be reported separately by the year the claim occurred.

(g) The number of claims closed without payment to the claimant during the calendar year next preceding, by the year the claim occurred, and the allocated loss expense paid thereon, separately by the year the claim occurred.

(h) The monetary amount reserved in the annual statement for the calendar year next preceding on claims incurred but not reported to the insurer.

(i) The number of lawsuits filed against the insurer’s insureds, and the number of doctors, included therein, during the calendar year next preceding, to be separately reported by the year the claim occurred.

(j) A distribution by size of payment for those claims closed during the calendar year next preceding, showing the number of claims and total amount paid for each monetary category, as determined by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11556.

The reserve for outstanding losses and loss expenses under such liability or compensation insurance shall be determined in accordance with the regulations of the commissioner promulgated pursuant to Section 923.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 121.)
-------------------------------------------

11557.

Whenever the reserves for outstanding liability or compensation losses and loss expenses of any insurer, computed pursuant to this article, seem inadequate to the commissioner, he shall require such insurer to maintain additional reserves.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 705.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Actions on Policies Containing Liability Provisions [11580. - 11589.5.]

11580.

A policy insuring against losses set forth in subdivision (a) shall not be issued or delivered to any person in this state unless it contains the provisions set forth in subdivision (b). Such policy, whether or not actually containing such provisions, shall be construed as if such provisions were embodied therein.

(a) Unless it contains such provisions, the following policies of insurance shall not be thus issued or delivered:

(1) Against loss or damage resulting from liability for injury suffered by another person other than (i) a policy of workers’ compensation insurance, or (ii) a policy issued by a nonadmitted Mexican insurer solely for use in the Republic of Mexico.

(2) Against loss of or damage to property caused by draught animals or any vehicle, and for which the insured is liable, other than a policy which provides insurance in the Republic of Mexico, issued or delivered in this state by a nonadmitted Mexican insurer.

(b) Such policy shall not be thus issued or delivered to any person in this state unless it contains all the following provisions:

(1) A provision that the insolvency or bankruptcy of the insured will not release the insurer from the payment of damages for injury sustained or loss occasioned during the life of such policy.

(2) A provision that whenever judgment is secured against the insured or the executor or administrator of a deceased insured in an action based upon bodily injury, death, or property damage, then an action may be brought against the insurer on the policy and subject to its terms and limitations, by such judgment creditor to recover on the judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1145, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.01.

(a) A policy insuring against legal liability arising from the rendering of professional services by an insured licensed pursuant to the provisions of Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and which generally limits the coverage thereof to liability for only those claims that are first made against the insured while the policy is in force, shall not be issued or delivered to any person in this state unless the application or proposal therefor complies with subdivision (b) and the policy complies with subdivision (c).

(b) The form of application or proposal for any such policy described in subdivision (a) shall recite prominently and conspicuously at the heading thereof that it is an application or proposal for a claims-made policy.

(c) Each such policy described in subdivision (a) shall contain on the face page thereof a prominent and conspicuous legend or statement substantially to the following effect:
 
NOTICE
“Except to such extent as may otherwise be provided herein, the coverage of this policy is limited generally to liability for only those claims that are first made against the insured while the policy is in force. Please review the policy carefully and discuss the coverage thereunder with your insurance agent or broker.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.02.

A liability insurer may review bills submitted for the defense of its insured, but shall not compensate a reviewer based on any of the following:

(a) A percentage of the amount by which a bill is reduced for payment.

(b) The number of claims or the cost of services for which the reviewer has denied authorization or payment.

(c) An agreement that no compensation will be due unless one or more bills are reduced for payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 883, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.04.

Any additional insured endorsement issued by an admitted or nonadmitted insurer for the benefit of a public agency in connection with, collateral to, or affecting any construction contract to which the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 2782 of the Civil Code apply, shall not provide any duty of indemnity coverage for the active negligence of the additional insured in any case where an agreement to indemnify the additional insured would be invalid under subdivision (b) of Section 2782 of the Civil Code. In any case where a claim or loss encompasses the negligence of the original insured and the active negligence of the additional insured that is not covered because of this section, the insurer’s obligation shall be limited to obligations permitted by this section.

Any contract requirement that requires a promisor to procure insurance that is invalid under this section shall be invalid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 558, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.05.

The Legislature declares that the public policy of this state in regard to provisions authorized or required to be included in policies affording automobile liability insurance or motor vehicle liability insurance issued or delivered in this state shall be as stated in this article, that this article expresses the total public policy of this state respecting the content of such policies, and that no provision of this article or of the Vehicle Code shall apply to policies affording automobile liability insurance or motor vehicle liability insurance in the Republic of Mexico issued or delivered in this state by a nonadmitted Mexican insurer. The Legislature further declares that it is the intent of the Legislature that the requirements set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 16450) of Chapter 3 of Division 7 of the Vehicle Code shall apply only to an owner’s policy or operator’s policy of liability insurance certified as provided in Section 16431 of the Vehicle Code as proof of ability to respond in damages, and that the requirements set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 11620) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code shall apply only to automobile liability insurance policies issued under the California Assigned Risk Plan. Except as provided above, any other policy issued or delivered in this state affording liability insurance with respect to ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle shall comply with the requirements set forth in Sections 11580, 11580.1, and 11580.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1145.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.06.

Except as may be otherwise provided in this article:

(a) The term “motor vehicle” means any vehicle designed for use principally upon streets and highways and subject to motor vehicle registration under the laws of this state.

(b) The term “insured” shall include the person or persons to whom any policy subject to this article is issued as named insured and any other person to whom coverage is afforded under the terms of any such policy.

(c) The term “bodily injury” shall include sickness or disease, including death resulting therefrom.

(d) The term “automobile” means any self-propelled motor vehicle, with neither more than nor less than four wheels, designed for use principally upon streets and highways and subject to motor vehicle registration under the laws of this state.

(e) The term “arrest” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Section 834 of the Penal Code.

(f) The term “operated by” or “when operating” shall be conclusively presumed to describe the conduct of the person sitting immediately behind the steering controls of the motor vehicle. The person shall be conclusively presumed to be the sole operator of the motor vehicle.

(g) The term “use” when applied to a motor vehicle shall only mean operating, maintaining, loading, or unloading a motor vehicle.

(h) The word “terms” when used with reference to a policy or endorsement includes the provision of coverage, exclusions, restrictions, conditions, deductions, and limits.

(i) Unless otherwise provided in this code, the term “leased motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle leased or rented by a lessor licensed to lease motor vehicles under a written contract for a period of six months or longer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 359, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.07.

Except when required by a conditional sales vendor, no person or entity who is licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) of Part 2 of Division 1 and who holds an appointment by, or transacts insurance with, an insurer which is admitted to issue a policy of automobile liability insurance, as described in Section 16054 of the Vehicle Code, or a motor vehicle liability policy, as described in Section 16450 of the Vehicle Code, or any policy or coverage described in Section 660, shall require any insured to purchase or maintain automobile collision coverage, as defined in Section 660, for the insured motor vehicle as a condition to the issuance or maintenance of comprehensive coverage for such motor vehicle, unless such policy requires the purchase of both such coverages.

This section shall apply only to those policies and coverages issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.

As used in this section, “comprehensive coverage” means coverage for loss or damage to the insured motor vehicle resulting from a cause other than collision or upset.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.08.

With respect to disclosure of the fact of an arrest for any violation of the Vehicle Code or of a city or county ordinance or resolution relating to vehicles or their operators or owner which did not result in a conviction, the issuer, or his agency or employee, of any policy of automobile liability insurance (as described in Section 16056 of the Vehicle Code), any motor vehicle liability policy (as described in Section 16450 of the Vehicle Code), or any policy or coverage described in Section 660, shall not inquire of an applicant whether he has been arrested under such circumstances or to condition the issuance of any such policy on the applicant’s making such disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.09.

(a) Any policy of automobile liability insurance shall contain a notice stating limits of future coverage. The notice shall be prominently displayed on the first page of the policy or in related documents which are provided to the policyholder.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Automobile liability insurance policy” means a policy of automobile liability insurance, and any other policy of automobile insurance that contains as a component automobile liability insurance, but limited to those policies that are defined in Section 660.

(2) “Limits of future coverage” means specified reasons for which the insurer may cancel or refuse to renew the policy or increase the premium for the same coverage.

(3) “Notice” means the specific information specified in paragraph (2) or a clear and concise reference to the exact location of the information in the policy or in related documents provided to the policyholder.

(c) For the purposes of notice of cancellation, the insurer shall list those grounds for valid notice of cancellation as specified in Section 661.

(d) For the purposes of nonrenewal or premium increase, the insurer shall state the reasons for this action which shall include, if applicable, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Accident involvement by an insured, and whether the insured is at fault in the accident.

(2) A change in, or an addition of, an insured vehicle.

(3) A change in, or addition of, an insured under the policy.

(4) A change in the location of garaging of an insured vehicle.

(5) A change in the use of the insured vehicle.

(6) Convictions for violating any provision of the Vehicle Code or the Penal Code relating to the operation of a motor vehicle.

(7) The payment made by an insurer due to a claim filed by an insured or a third party.

(e) A statement shall be included in the nonrenewal section that some nonrenewals and premium increases may result from reasons that are not specified in subdivision (d) for an insurer that are both lawful and not unfairly discriminatory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1143, Sec. 1.   Operative April 1, 1989, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 1143.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.010.

(a) Any automobile liability insurer that is responsible for coverage for ordinary, reasonable, and necessary medical transportation services provided to an insured, or on behalf of an insured, to a valid claimant is liable for those charges to the person performing those services. The insurer may discharge this obligation by making payment to the person performing the medical transportation services or to the insured or on behalf of the insured to the claimant.

(b) Any insured or claimant who has received payment, which includes charges for medical transportation services, from an insurer for a loss relating to a vehicle is liable for those charges to the person performing those services.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11580.09 (as added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 201) by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 99.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.011.

(a) As used in this section, “child passenger restraint system” means a system as described in Section 27360 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) Every policy of automobile liability insurance, as described in Section 16054 of the Vehicle Code, shall provide liability coverage for replacement of a child passenger restraint system that was damaged or was in use by a child during an accident for which liability coverage under the policy is applicable due to the liability of an insured.

(c) Every policy of automobile liability insurance that provides uninsured motorist property damage coverage, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11580.26, shall
 provide coverage for replacement of a child passenger restraint system that was damaged or was in use by a child during an accident for which uninsured motorist property damage coverage under the policy is applicable due to the liability of an uninsured motorist.

(d) Every policy that provides automobile collision coverage, as described in Section 660, or every policy that provides automobile physical damage coverage, as described in Section 660, shall include a child passenger restraint system within the definition of covered property, if the child passenger restraint system was in use by a child during an accident or, if the child passenger restraint system was in the vehicle and it sustained a loss covered by the policy.

(e) Upon the filing of a claim pursuant to a policy described in subdivision (b), (c), or (d), unless otherwise determined, an insurer shall have an obligation
 to ask whether a child passenger restraint system was in use by a child during an accident or was in the vehicle at the time of a loss that is covered by the policy, and an obligation to replace the child passenger restraint system or reimburse the claimant for the cost of purchasing a new passenger restraint system in accordance with this section if it was in use by a child during the accident or if it sustained a covered loss while in the vehicle.

(f) An insured, upon acquiring a replacement child passenger restraint system, may surrender the child passenger restraint system that was replaced to the nearest office of the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 234, Sec. 13.   (AB 299)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

11580.1.

(a) No policy of automobile liability insurance described in Section 16054 of the Vehicle Code covering liability arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of any motor vehicle shall be issued or delivered in this state on or after the effective date of this section unless it contains the provisions set forth in subdivision (b). However, none of the requirements of subdivision (b) shall apply to the insurance afforded under the policy (1) to the extent that the insurance exceeds the limits specified in subdivision (a) of Section 16056 of the Vehicle Code, or (2) if the policy contains an underlying insurance requirement, or provides for a retained limit of self-insurance, equal to or greater than the limits specified in subdivision (a)
 of Section 16056 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) Every policy of automobile liability insurance to which subdivision (a) applies shall contain all of the following provisions:

(1) Coverage limits not less than the limits specified in subdivision (a) of Section 16056 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) Designation by explicit description of, or appropriate reference to, the motor vehicles or class of motor vehicles to which coverage is specifically granted.

(3) Designation by explicit description of the purposes for which coverage for those motor vehicles is specifically excluded.

(4) Provision affording insurance to the named insured with respect to any owned or leased motor vehicle covered by the policy,
 and to the same extent that insurance is afforded to the named insured, to any other person using the motor vehicle, provided the use is by the named insured or with his or her permission, express or implied, and within the scope of that permission, except that: (A) with regard to insurance afforded for the loading or unloading of the motor vehicle, the insurance may be limited to apply only to the named insured, a relative of the named insured who is a resident of the named insured’s household, a lessee or bailee of the motor vehicle, or an employee of any of those persons; and (B) the insurance afforded to any person other than the named insured need not apply to: (i) any employee with respect to bodily injury sustained by a fellow employee injured in the scope and course of his or her employment, or (ii) any person, or to any agent or employee thereof, employed or otherwise engaged in the business of selling, repairing, servicing, delivering, testing, road-testing, parking, or storing automobiles with
 respect to any accident arising out of the maintenance or use of a motor vehicle in connection therewith. As used in this chapter, “owned motor vehicle” includes all motor vehicles described and rated in the policy.

(c) In addition to any exclusion provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the insurance afforded by any policy of automobile liability insurance to which subdivision (a) applies, including the insurer’s obligation to defend, may, by appropriate policy provision, be made inapplicable to any or all of the following:

(1) Liability assumed by the insured under contract.

(2) Liability for bodily injury or property damage caused intentionally by or at the direction of the insured.

(3) Liability imposed upon or assumed by the insured under any
 workers’ compensation law.

(4) Liability for bodily injury to any employee of the insured arising out of and in the course of his or her employment.

(5) Liability for bodily injury to an insured or liability for bodily injury to an insured whenever the ultimate benefits of that indemnification accrue directly or indirectly to an insured.

(6) Liability for damage to property owned, rented to, transported by, or in the charge of, an insured. A motor vehicle operated by an insured shall be considered to be property in the charge of an insured.

(7) Liability for any bodily injury or property damage with respect to which insurance is or can be afforded under a nuclear energy liability policy.

(8) Any motor vehicle or class of motor vehicles, as described or designated in the policy, with respect to which coverage is explicitly excluded, in whole or in part.

“The insured” as used in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4) shall mean only that insured under the policy against whom the particular claim is made or suit brought. “An insured” as used in paragraphs (5) and (6) shall mean any insured under the policy including those persons who would have otherwise been included within the policy’s definition of an insured but, by agreement, are subject to the limitations of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).
